it: Meccanismo di bloccaggio del coltello: Ambi lock; Blocco Axis/barra trasversale; Bolster lock; Bolt lock; Blocco a pulsante; Clutch lock; Blocco a collare; Blocco a compressione; Frame lock; Integrale/R.I.L.; Blocco a leva; Liner lock; Lockback; Ram-Lok; Slide lock; Slip joint (senza blocco); Tri-Ad lock; Altro
lt-LT: Peilio užfiksavimo mechanizmas: Dvipusis užraktas (Ambi lock); Axis / skersinis užraktas; Atramos užraktas (Bolster lock); Skląsčio užraktas; Mygtuko užraktas; Sankabos užraktas (Clutch lock); Žiedinis užraktas (Collar lock); Glaudinamasis užraktas; Rėmo užraktas; Integralinis / R.I.L.; Svirties užraktas; Vidinis užraktas (Liner lock); Galinio fiksatoriaus užraktas; Ram-Lok; Slankusis užraktas; Slystamasis sujungimas (neužsifiksuojantis); Tri-Ad užraktas; Kita
hu: Kés zármechanizmusa: Ambi zár; Axis/Keresztrudas zár; Baknizár; Tolózár (bolt lock); Gombos zár; Kuplungos zár; Gallérzár; Kompressziós zár; Keretzár; Beépített/R.I.L.; Karos zár; Keresztzár (liner lock); Hátsó zár (lockback); Ram-Lok; Csúszózár; Slip joint (nem zárható); Tri-Ad zár; Egyéb
da: Låsemekanisme for kniv: Ambi-lås; Axis/Crossbar-lås; Bolster-lås; Bolt-lås; Knaplås; Clutch-lås; Kravelås; Kompressionslås; Rammelås; Integral/R.I.L.; Håndtagslås; Liner-lås; Lockback; Ram-Lok; Skydelås; Slipjoint (ikke-låsende); Tri-Ad-lås; Andet
sk-SK: Mechanizmus aretácie noža: Zámok Ambi; Zámok Axis/Crossbar; Zámok Bolster; Zámok Bolt; Tlačidlový zámok; Zámok Clutch; Objímkový zámok; Kompresný zámok; Zámok Frame lock; Integral/R.I.L.; Pákový zámok; Zámok Liner lock; Lockback; Ram-Lok; Posuvný zámok; Slipjoint (bez zaistenia); Zámok Tri-Ad; Iné
ru: Механизм блокировки ножа: Ambi lock; Axis/Crossbar lock; Bolster lock; Bolt lock; Button lock; Clutch lock; Collar lock; Compression lock; Frame lock; Integral/R.I.L.; Lever lock; Liner lock; Lockback; Ram-Lok; Slide lock; Slip joint (без фиксации); Tri-Ad lock; Другое
tr: Bıçak kilitleme mekanizması: Çok yönlü kilit; Eksen/Çapraz çubuk kilidi; Bilezik kilidi; Sürgülü kilit; Düğme kilidi; Kavrama kilidi; Yaka kilidi; Sıkıştırma kilidi; Gövde kilidi; Entegre/R.I.L.; Levyeli kilit; Astar kilidi; Arkadan kilitleme; Ram-Lok; Sürgülü kilit; Geçmeli mafsal (kilitsiz); Tri-Ad kilidi; Diğer
zh-CN: 刀刃锁止装置: Ambi 锁; Axis/横杆锁; 刀枕锁; 枪栓锁; 按钮锁; 离合锁; 项圈锁; 压缩锁; 框架锁; 一体/R.I.L. 锁; 杠杆锁; 衬里锁; 背锁; Ram-Lok; 滑动锁; 滑动关节（非锁定）; Tri-Ad 锁; 其他
en: Knife locking mechanism: Ambi lock; Axis/Crossbar lock; Bolster lock; Bolt lock; Button lock; Clutch lock; Collar lock; Compression lock; Frame lock; Integral/R.I.L.; Lever lock; Liner lock; Lockback; Ram-Lok; Slide lock; Slip joint (non-locking); Tri-Ad lock; Other
th: กลไกการล็อกใบมีด: แอมบิล็อก; แอ็กซิสล็อก/ครอสบาร์ล็อก; บอลสเตอร์ล็อก; โบลต์ล็อก; ปุ่มล็อก; คลัตช์ล็อก; ปลอกล็อก; คอมเพรสชันล็อก; เฟรมล็อก; อินทิกรัลล็อก/R.I.L.; คันโยกล็อก; ไลเนอร์ล็อก; ล็อกแบ็ก; Ram-Lok; สไลด์ล็อก; สลิปจอยต์ (ไม่มีล็อก); ไทรแอ็ดล็อก; อื่นๆ
nl: Mesvergrendelingsmechanisme: Ambilock; Axis-/crossbar-slot; Bolsterlock; Boltslot; Buttonlock; Clutchlock; Kraagslot; Compressieslot; Framelock; Integral/R.I.L.; Leverlock; Linerlock; Lockback; Ram-Lok; Slidelock; Slipjoint (niet-vergrendelend); Tri-Ad-slot; Anders
cs: Zajišťovací mechanismus nože: Ambi lock; Axis/Crossbar lock; Bolster lock; Bolt lock; Button lock; Clutch lock; Límcový zámek (Collar lock); Compression lock; Frame lock; Integral/R.I.L.; Lever lock; Liner lock; Lockback; Ram-Lok; Posuvný zámek (Slide lock); Slip joint (bez pojistky); Tri-Ad lock; Jiné
pt-PT: Mecanismo de bloqueio da lâmina: Bloqueio Ambi; Bloqueio Axis/barra transversal; Bloqueio de bolster; Bloqueio de ferrolho; Bloqueio de botão; Bloqueio de embraiagem; Bloqueio de colar; Bloqueio de compressão; Bloqueio de estrutura; Integral/R.I.L.; Bloqueio de alavanca; Liner lock; Fecho traseiro; Ram-Lok; Bloqueio deslizante; Junta deslizante (sem bloqueio); Bloqueio Tri-Ad; Outro
ro-RO: Mecanism de blocare a cuțitului: Ambi lock; Axis/Crossbar lock; Bolster lock; Bolt lock; Button lock; Clutch lock; Collar lock; Compression lock; Frame lock; Integral/R.I.L.; Lever lock; Liner lock; Lockback; Ram-Lok; Slide lock; Slip joint (fără blocare); Tri-Ad lock; Altele
bg-BG: Заключващ механизъм на нож: Двустранно заключване (Ambi lock); Заключване Axis/Crossbar; Заключване с болстер; Заключване с болт; Заключване с бутон; Заключване тип съединител; Заключване с яка; Компресионно заключване; Заключване с рамка (Frame lock); Интегрално/R.I.L.; Заключване с лост; Пластинчато заключване (Liner lock); Lockback; Ram-Lok; Плъзгащо заключване; Slipjoint (без заключване); Заключване Tri-Ad; Друго
el: Μηχανισμός ασφάλισης μαχαιριού: Ambi lock; Axis/Crossbar lock; Bolster lock; Bolt lock; Button lock; Clutch lock; Collar lock; Compression lock; Frame lock; Integral/R.I.L.; Lever lock; Liner lock; Lockback; Ram-Lok; Slide lock; Slip joint (χωρίς ασφάλεια); Tri-Ad lock; Άλλο
fi: Veitsen lukitusmekanismi: Ambi-lukko; Axis-/Crossbar-lukko; Bolster-lukko; Bolt lock -lukko; Painikelukko; Clutch-lukko; Kauluslukko; Kompressiolukko; Runkolukko; Integral / R.I.L.; Vipulukko; Liner lock; Lockback-lukko; Ram-Lok; Liukulukko; Slip joint (ei lukkiutuva); Tri-Ad-lukko; Muu
hr-HR: Mehanizam zaključavanja noža: Ambi zaključavanje; Axis/Crossbar zaključavanje; Bolster zaključavanje; Zaključavanje vijkom (Bolt lock); Zaključavanje gumbom; Clutch zaključavanje; Zaključavanje ogrlicom; Kompresijsko zaključavanje; Okvirno zaključavanje (Frame lock); Integralno / R.I.L.; Zaključavanje polugom; Liner lock zaključavanje (unutrašnje); Lockback; Ram-Lok; Klizno zaključavanje; Klizni spoj (bez zaključavanja); Tri-Ad zaključavanje; Ostalo
pt-BR: Mecanismo para travar a faca: Trava ambidestra; Trava AXIS/transversal; Trava bolster; Trava de pino; Trava de botão; Trava clutch; Trava de colar; Trava de compressão; Trava de quadro; Integral/R.I.L.; Trava de alavanca; Trava liner; Trava traseira; Ram-Lok; Trava deslizante; Junta deslizante (sem trava); Trava Tri-Ad; Outra
ja: ナイフロックメカニズム: アンビロック; Axis/クロスバーロック; ボルスターロック; ボルトロック; ボタンロック; クラッチロック; カラーロック; コンプレッションロック; フレームロック; インテグラル/R.I.L.; レバーロック; ライナーロック; ロックバック; Ram-Lok; スライドロック; スリップジョイント (非ロック式); Tri-Adロック; その他
sl-SI: Mehanizem zaklepanja noža: Zaklep Ambi; Zaklep Axis/prečni zaklep; Zaklep Bolster; Zaklep s sornikom; Zaklep z gumbom; Sklopni zaklep (Clutch lock); Vratni zaklep (Collar lock); Kompresijski zaklep; Okvirni zaklep (Frame lock); Integralni/R.I.L.; Zaklep z ročico; Notranji zaklep (Liner lock); Zaklep na hrbtišču (Lockback); Ram-Lok; Drsni zaklep; Drsna vzmet (brez zaklepa); Zaklep Tri-Ad; Drugo
nb: Låsemekanisme for kniv: Ambi-lås; Axis-/tverrstangslås; Bolster-lås; Boltlås; Knappelås; Clutch-lås; Kragelås; Kompresjonslås; Rammelås; Integral/R.I.L.; Spaklås; Liner lock; Lockback; Ram-Lok; Skyvelås; Slip joint (uten lås); Tri-Ad-lås; Annet
es: Mecanismo de bloqueo de la navaja: Bloqueo ambidiestro; Bloqueo Axis/de barra cruzada; Bloqueo de virola; Bloqueo de pasador; Bloqueo de botón; Bloqueo de embrague; Bloqueo de collar; Bloqueo de compresión; Bloqueo de marco; Integral/R.I.L.; Bloqueo de palanca; Bloqueo de lámina; Bloqueo Lockback; Ram-Lok; Bloqueo deslizante; Junta deslizante (sin bloqueo); Bloqueo Tri-Ad; Otro
ko: 나이프 잠금 메커니즘 유형: 앰비 록; 액시스/크로스바 록; 볼스터 록; 볼트 록; 버튼 록; 클러치 록; 칼라 록; 컴프레션 록; 프레임 록; 인테그랄/R.I.L.; 레버 록; 라이너 록; 록백; 램록; 슬라이드 록; 슬립 조인트(비잠금); 트라이애드 록; 기타
pl: Mechanizm blokowania noża: Blokada Ambi; Blokada Axis/Crossbar; Blokada Bolster lock; Blokada Bolt lock; Blokada na przycisk; Blokada Clutch lock; Blokada Collar lock; Blokada kompresyjna (Compression lock); Blokada Frame lock; Integralna/R.I.L.; Blokada Lever lock; Blokada Liner lock; Blokada Lockback; Ram-Lok; Blokada Slide lock; Slip joint (bez blokady); Blokada Tri-Ad; Inna
de: Verriegelungsmechanismus der Messers: Ambi-Lock; Axis-/Crossbar-Lock; Bolster-Lock; Bolt-Lock; Button-Lock; Clutch-Lock; Ringverschluss; Compression-Lock; Frame-Lock; Integral/R.I.L.; Lever-Lock; Liner-Lock; Lockback; Ram-Lok; Schiebeverschluss; Slip-Joint (nicht verriegelnd); Tri-Ad-Lock; Sonstige
sv: Låsmekanism för kniv: Ambi-lås; Axis/Crossbar-lås; Bolster-lås; Bultlås; Knapplås; Clutch-lås; Kraglås; Kompressionslås; Ramlås; Integral/R.I.L.; Spaklås; Liner-lock; Lockback; Ram-Lok; Skjutlås; Slipjoint (ej låsbar); Tri-Ad-lås; Övrigt
vi: Cơ chế khóa bảo vệ của dao: Khóa đa hướng (Ambi lock); Khóa chốt ngang/Axis; Khóa chốt đỡ; Khóa chốt trượt; Khóa nút bấm; Khóa ly hợp; Khóa cổ; Khóa nén; Khóa khung; Integral/R.I.L.; Khóa đòn bẩy; Khóa chèn; Khóa lưng; Ram-Lok; Khóa trượt; Khớp trượt (không khóa); Khóa Tri-Ad; Khác
fr: Mécanisme de verrouillage du couteau: Verrouillage ambidextre; Verrouillage Axis/transversal; Bolster lock; Verrouillage à verrou; Verrouillage à bouton; Clutch lock; Verrouillage par bague; Verrouillage par compression; Frame lock; Intégral/R.I.L.; Verrouillage à levier; Liner lock; Cran d’arrêt à pompe; Ram-Lok; Verrouillage coulissant; Cran forcé (sans verrouillage); Tri-Ad lock; Autre
zh-TW: 刀具鎖定機制: 雙手通用鎖; Axis/橫桿鎖; 護手鎖; 螺栓鎖; 按鈕鎖; 離合鎖; 軸環鎖; 壓縮鎖; 框架鎖; 整體式/R.I.L. 鎖; 撥桿鎖; 襯裡鎖; 背鎖; Ram-Lok; 滑動鎖; 滑動關節 (非鎖定); Tri-Ad 鎖; 其他